Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 2. Purpose and Powers.

Sec. 44.88.070.
Purpose of the authority.

The purpose of the authority is to promote, develop, and advance the general prosperity and economic welfare of the people of the state, to relieve problems of unemployment, and to create additional employment by

providing various means of financing and means of facilitating the financing, in cooperation with federal, state, and private institutions, of industrial, manufacturing, energy, export, small business, and business enterprises and the other facilities referred to in AS

44.88.010(a)

in the state;

owning and operating or providing development project financing for the enterprises and other facilities described in AS

44.88.172

;

fostering the expansion of exports of goods, services, and raw materials of the state;

cooperating and acting in conjunction with other organizations, public and private, the objects of which are the promotion and advancement of export trade activities in the state;

establishing a source of funding credit guarantees and insurance, not otherwise available, to support export development;

providing and cooperating or participating with federal, state, and private institutions to provide actual and potential state exporters, particularly small- and medium-sized exporters, with financial assistance in support of export transactions.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1967; am § 54 ch 106 SLA 1980; am § 31 ch 115 SLA 1981; am § 4 ch 162 SLA 1984; am § 4 ch 42 SLA 1987; am § 29 ch 9 SLA 2013; am § 2 ch 26 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.61.070. Renumbered in 1980.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2013 amendment, effective May 10, 2013, in (1), inserted “energy,” following “manufacturing,”.

The second 2013 amendment, effective May 30, 2013, in (2), inserted “or providing development project financing for” following “owning and operating”, and replaced references to “Alaska” with references to “the state” or similar, three times throughout the section.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning ch. 26, SLA 2013 (SB 23) see 2013 Senate Journal 40 — 42.

Sec. 44.88.080.
Powers of the authority.

In furtherance of its corporate purposes, the authority has the following powers in addition to its other powers:

to sue and be sued;

to have a seal and alter it at pleasure;

to make and alter bylaws for its organization and internal management;

to adopt regulations governing the exercise of its corporate powers;

to acquire an interest in a project as necessary or appropriate to provide financing for the project, whether by purchase, gift, or lease;

to lease to others a project acquired by it for the rentals and upon the terms and conditions the authority may consider advisable, including, without limitation, provisions for options to purchase or renew;

to issue bonds and otherwise to incur indebtedness, in accordance with AS

44.88.090

, in order to pay the cost of a project or development projects or in order to provide money for the authority’s purposes under this chapter; the authority may also secure payment of the bonds or other indebtedness as provided in this chapter;

to sell, by installment sale or otherwise, exchange, donate, convey, or encumber, in any manner by mortgage or by creation of any other security interest, real or personal property owned by it, or in which it has an interest, including a project, when, in the judgment of the authority, the action is in furtherance of its corporate purposes;

to accept gifts, grants, or loans from, and enter into contracts or other transactions regarding them with, a federal agency, an agency or instrumentality of the state, a municipality, a private organization, or other source;

to deposit or invest its funds, subject to agreements with bondholders;

to enter into contracts or agreements with respect to the exercise of any of its powers, and do all things necessary or convenient to carry out its corporate purposes and exercise the powers granted in this chapter;

to purchase or insure loans to finance the costs of manufacturing, industrial, and business enterprise projects;

to enter into loan agreements with respect to one or more projects upon the terms and conditions the authority considers advisable;

to acquire, manage, and operate projects as the authority considers necessary or appropriate to serve a public purpose;

to assist private lenders to make loans to finance the costs of projects through loan commitments, short-term financing, or otherwise;

to accept gifts, grants, or loans from a federal agency, from an agency or instrumentality of the state or of a municipality, or from any other source;

to enter into contracts or other transactions with a federal agency, with an agency or instrumentality of the state or of a municipality, or with a private organization or other entity consistent with the exercise of any power under this chapter;

to facilitate the expansion of a secondary market for the resale of federally or commercially insured loans made to finance the costs of projects in the state held by federal and state chartered financial institutions or by the Alaska Commercial Fishing and Agriculture Bank;

to charge fees or other forms of remuneration for the use or possession of the projects described in (14) of this section in accordance with the agreements described in (11) and (17) of this section, other agreements pertaining to the projects, covenants, or representations made in bond documents pertaining to the projects, or regulations of the authority pertaining to the projects;

to participate with government or private industry in programs for technical assistance, loans, technology, transfer, or other programs related to the exportation of goods, services, or raw materials of the state with respect to its financing activities;

to provide export finance training for office staff and other individuals involved in export finance assistance, including the training sessions that may be provided by the United States Export-Import Bank or other organizations;

to coordinate to the maximum extent possible its efforts to promote the export of goods, services, and raw materials of the state with programs and goals of the United States Export-Import Bank, the International Trade Administration of the United States Department of Commerce, the Foreign Credit Insurance Association, and other private and public programs designed to provide export assistance and export-related financing;

to guarantee loans related to qualified export transactions under regulations adopted by the authority;

to provide financing assistance, in cooperation with federal, state, and private institutions, as provided in this chapter for small business enterprises;

to make cooperative agreements with the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, acting on behalf of the international airports revenue fund established under AS

37.15.430

, to acquire, equip, operate, maintain, construct, or install facilities that will enhance the competitiveness of the international airports, including a cooperative agreement to lend amounts from the international airports revenue fund to finance the development or improvement of utilities serving the airports;

to screen potential applicants for a new business incentive grant and recommend the award of the grants under AS

45.81.020

;

to oversee the administration of outstanding grants awarded by the Alaska Science and Technology Foundation under former AS

37.17.010

— 37.17.110;

to oversee the administration of outstanding BIDCO assistance grants and loans made by the Alaska Science and Technology Foundation under former AS

37.17.200

— 37.17.390;

to guarantee loans made to the Alaska Insurance Guaranty Association (AS

21.80.040

), with these guarantees limited to loans necessary to make the association financially able to meet cash flow needs up to a maximum outstanding principal balance at any time of $30,000,000;

with legislative approval and notwithstanding AS

44.88.060

, to purchase from the Alaska Energy Authority as an investment of the revolving fund, loans of the power project fund established under AS

42.45.010

;

to consider, when exercising the powers listed in this section, the interests of local governments affected by the authority’s activities to share in the benefits of these activities, with appropriate consideration of the authority’s ability to meet debt obligations, issue new debt, and fulfill the authority’s purposes;

to provide development project financing for all or a portion of the cost of a development project as provided in AS

44.88.172

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1967; am §§ 55 — 59 ch 106 SLA 1980; am §§ 32, 33 ch 115 SLA 1981; am § 5 ch 162 SLA 1984; am §§ 5, 6 ch 42 SLA 1987; am § 6 ch 123 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 8 SLA 1998; am § 7 ch 2 SLA 2004; am § 4 ch 61 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 69 SLA 2010; am § 4 ch 70 SLA 2010; am § 3 ch 26 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.61.080. Renumbered in 1980.

Paragraph (31) was enacted as paragraph (30); renumbered in 2010.

Cross references. —

For other powers of the authority, see AS

44.88.420

and

44.88.560

.

For legislative authorization and approval of the sale and purchase of certain power project fund loans between the Alaska Energy Authority and the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority bonds for the purposes as described in the section, and a declaration that the provision constitutes the legislative approval required by
AS

42.45.010

(

l

) and paragraph (30) of this section, see § 5,
ch. 70, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For conduit revenue bond program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 1.

For tax-exempt loan participation program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 2.

For taxable loan participation program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 3.

For development finance program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 5.

For business assistance program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 7.

For small business economic development loan program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 8.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2010 amendment, by § 1, ch. 69, effective September 9, 2010, added (30) (now (31)).

The second 2010 amendment, by § 4, ch. 70, effective June 12, 2010, added (30).

The 2013 amendment, effective May 30, 2013, replaced references to “Alaska” with references to “the state” or similar, three times throughout the section; added (32); made stylistic changes throughout.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 61, SLA 2004 (SB 276) adding paragraph (29) of this section, see 2004 Senate Journal 1989 - 1990.

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 70, SLA 2010 (SB 301), adding paragraph (30) of this section, see 2010 Senate Journal 1664 — 1666.

Sec. 44.88.085.
Administrative procedure.

Except for AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.319

(Open Meetings Act), the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act regarding the adoption of regulations (AS

44.62.040

—

44.62.319

) do not apply to the authority. The authority shall make available to members of the public copies of the regulations adopted under this section.

The authority may adopt regulations under this section by motion or by resolution or in any other manner permitted by its bylaws.

The authority may adopt regulations to carry out the purposes of this chapter and shall adopt regulations as provided in (g) of this section.

Except as provided in (e) of this section, at least 15 days before the adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation, the authority shall give public notice of the proposed action by publishing the notice in at least three newspapers of general circulation in the state and by mailing a copy of the notice to every person who has filed a request for notice of proposed regulations with the authority. The public notice must include a statement of the time, place, and nature of the proceedings for the adoption, amendment, or repeal of the regulation and must include an informative summary of the subject of the proposed action. On the date and at the time and place designated in the notice, the authority shall give each interested person or an authorized representative of the person, or both, the opportunity to present statements, arguments, or contentions orally or in writing and shall give members of the public an opportunity to present oral statements, arguments, or contentions for a total period of at least one hour. The authority shall consider all relevant matter presented to it before taking the proposed action on the regulation. At a hearing under this subsection, the authority may continue or postpone the hearing to a time and place determined by the authority and announced at the hearing before taking the action to continue or postpone the hearing. A regulation adopted, amended, or repealed by the authority may vary from the informative summary specified in this subsection if the subject matter of the action taken on the regulation remains the same and if the original notice of the proposed action was written so as to assure that members of the public are reasonably notified of the subject matter of the proposed action in order for them to determine whether their interests could be affected by the authority’s proposed action on that subject.

The adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation may be made as an emergency regulation if, in the order of adoption, the authority states the facts constituting the emergency and makes a finding that the adoption of the regulation is necessary for the immediate preservation of the orderly operation of the authority’s programs. The requirements of (d) of this section do not apply to the initial adoption of an emergency regulation; however, upon adoption of an emergency regulation under this subsection, the authority shall, within 10 days after that adoption, publish notice of the adoption in accordance with the notice procedures specified in (d) of this section. An emergency regulation adopted under this subsection may not remain in effect for more than 120 days unless, before the expiration of that period, the authority adopts that regulation as a permanent regulation in accordance with the procedures specified in (d) of this section.

A regulation adopted under this section takes effect immediately upon its adoption by the authority or at another time specified by the authority in its order of adoption.

The authority shall adopt regulations necessary for the following purposes in connection with its programs for the financing of projects under AS

44.88.155

—

44.88.159

:

determination of borrower eligibility;

loan guidelines and terms, including

maximum loan amounts;

required loan-to-value ratios; and

a method for determining loan interest rates;

characteristics of projects eligible for loans or purchase of loans; and

the qualifications of loan originators and servicers and the method of allocating amounts available for the purchase of loans.

[Repealed, § 21 ch 109 SLA 1998.]

History.

(§ 53 ch 113 SLA 1982; am §§ 7 — 12 ch 42 SLA 1987; am § 2 ch 51 SLA 1992; am § 21 ch 109 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 73 SLA 2003; am § 6 ch 164 SLA 2004; am § 59 ch 56 SLA 2005; am § 22 ch 7 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, “AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.319

(Open Meetings Act)” was substituted for “AS

44.62.310

and

44.62.312

regarding public meetings” in accordance with § 29(4), ch. 58, SLA 2010.

Administrative Code. —

For conduit revenue bond program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 1.

For tax-exempt loan participation program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 2.

For taxable loan participation program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 3.

For development finance program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 5.

For business assistance program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 7.

For small business economic development loan program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 8.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective August 1, 2018, in (a), substituted “AS

44.62.010

–

44.62.319

” for “AS

44.62.010

–

44.62.320

” in the first sentence, and deleted the third sentence, which read, “Within 45 days after adoption of a regulation under this section, the chairman of the authority shall submit the regulation adopted to the chairman of the Administrative Regulation Review Committee under AS

24.20.400

–

24.20.320

.”